Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1161.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 8000 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this act:
1. "Bureau" means the Legislative Service Bureau as established
in Section 450.1 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
Req. No. 11438 Page 1

2. "Department" means the Oklahoma Insurance Department as
established in Section 301 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
3. "Health benefit plan" means a health benefit plan as defined
pursuant to Section 6060.4 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and
4. "Mandate" means any requirement proposed in legislation or
regulation that obligates health benefit plans to:
a. provide, offer, or expand coverage for specific health
care services or providers, treatments, medical
supplies, or populations, or
b. implement operational or administrative processes such
as prior authorization, reporting requirements, or
claims procedures.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 8001 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. When a bill providing for a mandate impacting health benefit
plans in this state is introduced, it shall be assigned to the
respective Senate or House of Representatives standing committee or
subcommittee that is primarily responsible for the consideration of
insurance legislation.
B. If a majority of the total membership of such committee is
opposed to the bill or should such bill not receive a hearing in
such committee, no impact analysis as provided for in this section
shall be necessary, and the bill shall not be reported out by the
Req. No. 11438 Page 2

comm ittee and shall not be adopted or considered by the House of
Representatives or the Senate. If a majority of the committee
wishes to consider the bill further and votes in favor of an impact
analysis of the bill, an impact analysis shall be required as
provided in Section 3 of this act.
C. Except as otherwise provided by subsections B and D of
Section 3 of this act, no bill providing for a mandate impacting the
health plans in this state may be reported out of the committee to
which it is assigned or may be considered or adopted by the House of
Representatives or the Senate unless an impact analysis of the bill
is requested in accordance with Section 3 of this act.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 8002 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. When a committee of the Legislature votes to submit a bill
for an impact analysis as provided for in Section 2 of this act, the
Legislative Service Bureau shall submit such bill to the Oklahoma
Insurance Department for the purposes of conducting an impact
analysis.
B. When conducting such analysis, the Department shall:
1. Analyze the proposed mandate and prepare a written report to
be returned to the Legislative Service Bureau within sixty (60) days
from referral; and
2. Such report shall include, but not be limited to:
Req. No. 11438 Page 3

a. social impact:
(1) the extent to which the mandate addresses a
significant public health issue,
(2) the number of individuals and demographics
affected by the proposed mandate, and
(3) any anticipated impact on access to health care
services,
b. medical efficacy:
(1) a review of peer-reviewed studies, clinical
guidelines, and other scientific evidence
evaluating the effectiveness of the treatment or
service, and
(2) input from medical experts and professional
organizations as appropriate,
c. financial impact:
(1) the estimated effect on insurance premiums for
consumers and employers,
(2) the potential cost implications for insurers,
health care providers, and state-funded programs
that provide payment for covered services, and
(3) any anticipated impact on the stability of the
state's insurance market.
C. The Department may contract with a third-party vendor who
specializes in actuarial services, insurance mandate reviews, or
Req. No. 11438 Page 4

othe r services which the Department deems necessary to carry out the
provisions of this act; and
D. The Department may seek the input and expertise of any
agency of this state to evaluate the potential impact to state-
funded programs that provide payment for covered services.
E. Any amendment, conference committee report, or other
legislative proposal to a bill providing for a mandate impacting
health benefit plans in this state, which has not been submitted by
the Bureau for analysis, may, upon written request of the Chairman
of the committee having jurisdiction over such amendment or the
Floor Leader of the respective chamber of the Legislature, have the
Bureau submit such amendment, conference committee report, or other
legislative proposal to the Department for review.
F. The Bureau shall not submit more than five referrals for
analysis to the Department per fiscal year. Any additional referral
for analysis must be approved by the Department in writing at the
discretion of the Insurance Commissioner before submission by the
Bureau.
G. Upon return of the analysis by the Department to the Bureau,
the Bureau shall provide a copy, by either written or electronic
means, to the author of the legislative measure, the chairman of the
legislative committee(s) to which the measure was referred, and make
such report available on the legislative website, which is
accessible to the general public.
Req. No. 11438 Page 5

SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11438 MJ 01/08/25





















Req. No. 11438 Page 6